Utah statutes.
19-8-109.   Termination of agreement -- Cost recovery.
(1)  An agreement established under this chapter may be terminated by the
executive director or the applicant by giving 15 days prior notice, in
writing, to the other party.
(2) (a)  Only those costs incurred or obligated by the executive director
prior to the date of termination of the agreement are recoverable under an
agreement terminated under this section.  Any unused amounts already paid by
the applicant to the department as of the date of termination, other than the
application fee, are refundable to the applicant.
(b)  The executive director shall provide to the applicant written and
itemized notification of all costs for which the applicant is liable under
this Subsection (2) within 90 days after the date the agreement is terminated.
(3)  If the applicant does not pay to the executive director the department's
costs incurred in the voluntary cleanup within 90 days after the date the
applicant receives written notice under Subsection (2)(b), the executive
director may request the state attorney general to bring a court action in the
name of the state to recover the amount the applicant owes under this section,
and reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
(4)  Termination of an agreement under this section does not affect any right
of the:
(a)  executive director to recover costs under any other law; or
(b)  department to take enforcement and other action as allowed by law.
